Massachusetts, session 194th, S226.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 94 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 190A. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Advertisement”, any oral, written, graphic or pictorial representation made by a seller in
the course of the solicitation of retail business or which encourages a person to purchase a retail
product.
“Cosmetic product”, articles that are: (i) intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or
sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part thereof for
of 3

cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance; and (ii) articles
intended for use as a component of any such articles. A cosmetic product shall include products
and product ingredients that are manufactured or intended to be used for skin lightening and hair
relaxation.
“Harmful ingredients”, chemical components of a product or product component that are
toxic or have otherwise been found to have damaging health effects on the product user,
including mercury, parabens, estrogenic chemicals from placenta, benzophenone,
diethanolamine, nonylphenol, phthalates and talc powder, and other chemicals known to be
endocrine disruptors. Damaging health effects include the increased risk of developing a
deleterious condition in the future.
(b) No person shall make, promote or display an advertisement targeted towards children
under the age of 18 for a cosmetic product that contains harmful ingredients.
(c) No person shall make, promote or display an advertisement that utilizes the image,
voice or depiction of a child under the age of 18 the purposes of promoting the sale of a cosmetic
product that contains harmful ingredients.
(d) A violation of this section shall be punishable by a fine of not less than $5,000 for the
first violation and not less than $10,000 for subsequent violations.
(e) (1) The attorney general may initiate proceedings relating to a violation of this
section. Such proceedings may include, without limitation, an injunction, a civil penalty and
additional relief in a court of competent jurisdiction.
of 3

(2) A person harmed by a violation of this section may: (i) bring an action to enjoin the
violation; (ii) bring an action to recover for actual monetary loss from the violation or to receive
not more than $25,000 in damages for the violation, whichever is greater; or (iii) bring both such
actions.
(f) The attorney general shall promulgate any regulations necessary to implement this
section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect 90 days following its passage.
of 3